Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5621.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 9.46.0277 and 2009 c 133 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:"Raffle," as used in this chapter, means a game in which tickets bearing an individual number are sold for not more than one hundred dollars each and in which a prize or prizes are awarded on the basis of a drawing from the tickets by the person or persons conducting the game, when the game is conducted by a bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization, no person other than a bona fide member of the organization takes any part in the management or operation of the game, and no part of the proceeds thereof inure to the benefit of any person other than the organization conducting the game. "Raffle" does not include an electronic raffle conducted at a live sporting event where the total prize amount is 50 percent of the gross gambling receipts collected.--- END ---